Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2748
Rules and forms; Supreme Court; powers.

The Supreme Court may promulgate rules and forms for actions governed by the County Court Expedited Civil Actions Act, and such rules and forms shall not be in conflict with the act.

Laws 2020, LB912, § 8.